Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1256.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 1000.4a, as
amended by Section 3, Chapter 185, O.S.L. 2023 (59 O.S. Supp. 2024,
Section 1000.4a), is amended to read as follows:
Section 1000.4a. A. The Construction Industries Board shall
have the additional powers to:
1. Receive and convey information relating to the skilled
trades regulated by the Construction Industries Board including, but
not limited to, workforce development; and
2. Enter into contracts with the Oklahoma Department of Career
and Technology Education or, any Oklahoma State Board of Career and
Technology Education fully accredited vocational or technical
school, or any accredited system of education institution in the
ENGR. H. B. NO. 1256 Page 1

Stat e of Oklahoma this state receiving state appropriations and
offering programs in secondary and or postsecondary instruction that
provide electrical, mechanical, plumbing or roofing trade coursework
for any of the following purposes, or combination thereof:
a. developing and implementing instructional courses on
Oklahoma Statutes and rules that govern the
electrical, mechanical, plumbing and roofing trades,
which courses can be in conjunction with instruction
in performing trade work or instruction on statewide-
adopted trade codes, or both, for the advancement of
the electrical, mechanical, plumbing and roofing
trades, or
b. developing and implementing a workforce development
program that will create interest in the pursuit of a
skilled trade career. The workforce development
program may consist of, but is shall not be limited
to, use of the Internet, community and school
presentations, and research and instruction on the
electrical, mechanical, plumbing and roofing trades,
and may be implemented through public awareness and
public information campaigns to promote skilled trades
and skilled trade careers as provided in this section.
B. All contracts pursuant to this section shall be approved by
the Construction Industries Board in accordance with the Oklahoma
ENGR. H. B. NO. 1256 Page 2

Open Meeting Act. Costs of the contracts for education and
workforce development programs shall be paid from the Skilled Trade
Education and Workforce Development Fund established herein created
in subsection E of this section and funded by administrative fines
or penalties as described in this section. Applications for
proposals are to be submitted to the Board on forms provided
requiring sufficient justification and information to evaluate
costs, return on investment, value, and viability of the proposal.
Any contracts will include the requirement that the recipient of the
funds will, upon the completion of the contract, provide a written
report to the Board providing an accounting of expenditures,
describing an explanation of the funds used for the services
provided and the success of outreach demonstrating a return on the
investment including, but not limited to, an accounting of
accomplishments.
C. Fines or penalties collected by the Board and deposited in
the Oklahoma Mechanical Licensing Revolving Fund, the Electrical
Revolving Fund, the Plumbing Licensing Revolving Fund and the
Roofing Contractor Registration Revolving Fund may be transferred to
the Skilled Trade Education and Workforce Development Fund created
in subsection E of this section for the following purposes:
1. To develop instructional materials on Oklahoma laws,
statutes and rules, as they relate to the plumbing, mechanical,
electrical and roofing trades and state licensing standards;
ENGR. H. B. NO. 1256 Page 3

2. To cover the cost of equipment, materials, personnel and any
other costs of developing and implementing the trade curriculum; and
3. To cover the cost of equipment, materials, personnel and any
other costs of developing and implementing the workforce development
program used to promote the plumbing, mechanical, electrical and
roofing trades as a career in Oklahoma.
D. The Skilled Trade Education and Workforce Development Fund
monies shall be used only for the advancement of trade-related
education and workforce development, and only if available based
upon statutory limitations.
E. 1. There is hereby created in the State Treasury a
revolving fund for the Construction Industries Board to be
designated the "Skilled Trade Education and Workforce Development
Fund". The fund shall be a continuing fund, not subject to fiscal
year limitations. The fund shall consist of an annual transfer of
fully adjudicated fine revenue received in the Oklahoma Mechanical
Licensing Revolving Fund, Electrical Revolving Fund, Plumbing
Licensing Revolving Fund or Roofing Contractor Registration
Revolving Fund as determined pursuant to this section. Funds may be
transferred only from the prior fiscal year.
2. If actual receipts, not including fine receipts, exceed
actual expenses and outstanding encumbrances, then one hundred
percent (100%) of all fully adjudicated fine revenue received shall
be transferred from each specific trade revolving fund: the
ENGR. H. B. NO. 1256 Page 4

Okla homa Mechanical Licensing Revolving Fund, Electrical Revolving
Fund, Plumbing Licensing Revolving Fund or Roofing Contractor
Registration Revolving Fund.
3. If at any time the receipts in the Oklahoma Mechanical
Licensing Revolving Fund, Electrical Revolving Fund, Plumbing
Licensing Revolving Fund or Roofing Contractor Registration
Revolving Fund, not including fine receipts, are less than actual
expenses and outstanding encumbrances, then the difference of fine
receipts over actual expenses and outstanding encumbrances, if any,
shall be transferred.
4. If at any time the annual receipts in the Oklahoma
Mechanical Licensing Revolving Fund, Electrical Revolving Fund,
Plumbing Licensing Revolving Fund or Roofing Contractor Registration
Revolving Fund, including fine receipts, are less than the actual
expenses and outstanding encumbrances, there shall be no transfer of
funds for that period.
5. All monies accruing to the credit of the Skilled Trade
Education and Workforce Development Fund may be budgeted and
expended by the Construction Industries Board for workforce
development as it relates to the skilled trades and to contract for
the services identified in this act. Expenditures from the fund
shall be made upon warrants issued by the State Treasurer against
claims filed as prescribed by law with the Director of the Office of
Management and Enterprise Services for approval and payment.
ENGR. H. B. NO. 1256 Page 5

6. All unexpended or outstanding Skilled Trade Education and
Workforce Development Funds from any written agreement where work or
services have not been previously approved by specific quote or cost
estimate and have not been performed within eighteen (18) months of
the date the agreement was signed are hereby released from the
agreement and are available for future agreements approved by the
Board pursuant to this act, except for specific quotes, estimates,
or invoices that previously have been approved for payment,
performance has been initiated, and completed within twenty-four
(24) months of the signed agreement.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
Passed the House of Representatives the 3rd day of March, 2025.


Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives

Passed the Senate the ___ day of __________, 2025.


Presiding Officer of the Senate





ENGR. H. B. NO. 1256 Page 6